Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.520

Financial institution service providers—Reports of examination from other agencies.

The director may, in the director's discretion, accept service provider reports of examination, which are made by any other state or federal agency, in lieu of any examination authorized under the laws of this state.

[ 2022 c 49 s 3.]